California, session 20252026, AB2293.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 88009 of the Education Code is amended to read:88009. Governing boards (a) The governing board of a community college district shall fix and prescribe the duties to be performed by all persons in the classified service and other nonacademic positions of the community college district, except those persons employed as a part of a personnel commission commission’s staff as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter. 88060).This(b) This section shall apply to community college districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter. 88060).